California statutes. Penal Code
(a) A person issued a license pursuant to this article may apply to the licensing authority for an amendment to the license to do one or more of the following:

(1) Add or delete authority to carry a particular pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(2) Authorize the licensee to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(3) If the population of the county is less than 200,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, authorize the licensee to carry loaded
 and exposed in only that county a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(4) Change any restrictions or conditions on the license, including restrictions as to the time, place, manner, and circumstances under which the person may carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(b) If the licensing authority amends the license, a new license shall be issued to the licensee reflecting the amendments.

(c) An amendment to the license does not extend the original expiration date of the license and the license shall be subject to renewal at the same time as if the license had not been amended. 

(d) An application to amend a license does not constitute an application for renewal of
 the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26220.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in subdivision (c) of Section 26210, a license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed two years from the date of the license.

(b) If the licensee’s place of employment or business was the basis for issuance of a license pursuant to Section 26150, the license is valid for any period of time not to exceed 90 days from the date of the license, unless the license was issued pursuant to subdivision (d). The license shall be valid only in the county in which the license was originally issued. The licensee shall give a copy of this license to the licensing authority of the city, county,
 or city and county in which the licensee resides. The licensing authority that originally issued the license shall inform the licensee verbally and in writing in at least 16-point type of this obligation to give a copy of the license to the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county of residence. Any application to renew or extend the validity of, or reissue, the license may be granted only upon the concurrence of the licensing authority that originally issued the license and the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county in which the licensee resides.

(c) A license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed three years from the date of the license if the license is issued to any of the following individuals:

(1) A judge of a California court of record.

(2) A full-time court commissioner of a California court of record.

(3) A judge of a federal court.

(4) A magistrate of a federal court.

(d) A license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license if the license is issued to a custodial officer who is an employee of the sheriff as provided in Section 831.5, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s employment pursuant to Section 831.5 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article
 does not limit the validity of the license to a shorter time period.

(e) A license issued pursuant to Section 26170 to a peace officer appointed pursuant to Section 830.6 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s appointment pursuant to Section 830.6 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article does not limit the validity of the license to a shorter time period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 25.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.

(a) A record of the following shall be maintained in the office of the licensing authority:

(1) The denial of a license.

(2) The denial of an amendment to a license.

(3) The issuance of a license.

(4) The amendment of a license.

(5) The revocation of a license.

(b) Copies of each of the following shall be filed immediately by the licensing authority with the Department of Justice, in a
 manner as prescribed by the Attorney General:

(1) The denial of a license.

(2) The denial of an amendment to a license.

(3) The issuance of a license.

(4) The amendment of a license.

(5) The revocation of a license.

(c) (1) Commencing on or before January 1, 2000, and annually thereafter, each licensing authority shall submit to the Attorney General the total number of licenses issued to peace officers pursuant to Section 26170, and to judges pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155.

(2) The Attorney General shall collect and record the information submitted pursuant to this subdivision by county and licensing authority.

(d) The Department of Justice may adopt emergency regulations for the purpose of implementing Sections 26150 to 26230, inclusive, Section 29805, and Section 31635. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for
 filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect no later than two years after the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.

(e) If a licenseholder fails to submit an application for renewal within 90 days of the expiration of their license, the licensing authority shall immediately request that the department terminate state or federal subsequent notification pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11105.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 11.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26230.

(a) A person granted a license to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 shall not carry a firearm on or into any of the following:

(1) A place prohibited by Section 626.9.

(2) A building, real property, or parking area under the control of a preschool or childcare facility, including a room or portion of a building under the control of a preschool or childcare facility. This paragraph does not prevent the operator of a childcare facility in a family home from owning or possessing a firearm in the home if no child under childcare at the
 home is present in the home or the firearm in the home is unloaded, stored in a locked container, and stored separately from ammunition when a child under childcare at the home is present in the home so long as the childcare provider notifies clients that there is a firearm in the home.

(3) A building, parking area, or portion of a building under the control of an officer of the executive or legislative branch of the state government, except as allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 171c.

(4) A building designated for a court proceeding, including matters before a superior court, district court of appeal, or the California Supreme Court, parking area under the control of the owner or operator of that building, or a building or portion of a building under
 the control of the Supreme Court, unless the person is a justice, judge, or commissioner of that court.

(5) A building, parking area, or portion of a building under the control of a unit of local government, unless the firearm is being carried for purposes of training pursuant to Section 26165.

(6) A building, real property, and parking area under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or correctional institution, prison, or jail.

(7) A building, real property, and parking area under the control of a public or private hospital or hospital affiliate, mental health facility, nursing home, medical office, urgent care facility, or other place at which medical services are customarily provided.

(8) A bus, train, or other form of transportation paid for in whole or in part with public funds, and a building, real property, or parking area under the control of a transportation authority supported in whole or in part with public funds, unless the firearm is unloaded and is locked in a lock box, as defined in subdivision (y) of Section 4082 of, and subdivision (b) of Section 4094 of, Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, which is a firearm safety device, as defined in Section 16540, and that is listed on the department’s Roster of Firearm Safety Devices Certified for Sale pursuant to Sections 23650 and 23655, for the purpose of transporting the firearm.

(9) A building, real property, and parking area under the control of a vendor or an establishment where
 intoxicating liquor is sold for consumption on the premises.

(10) A public gathering or special event conducted on property open to the public that requires the issuance of a permit from a federal, state, or local government and sidewalk or street immediately adjacent to the public gathering or special event but is not more than 1,000 feet from the event or gathering, provided this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must walk through a public gathering in order to access their residence, place of business, or vehicle.

(11) A playground or public or private youth center, as defined in Section 626.95, and a street or sidewalk immediately adjacent to the playground or youth center.

(12) A park, athletic
 area, or athletic facility that is open to the public and a street or sidewalk immediately adjacent to those areas, provided this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must walk through such a place in order to access their residence, place of business, or vehicle.

(13) Real property under the control of the Department of Parks and Recreation or Department of Fish and Wildlife, except those areas designated for hunting pursuant to Section 5003.1 of the Public Resources Code, Section 4501 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, or any other designated public hunting area, public shooting ground, or building where firearm possession is permitted by applicable law.

(14) An area under the control of a public or private community college, college, or university,
 including, but not limited to, buildings, classrooms, laboratories, medical clinics, hospitals, artistic venues, athletic fields or venues, entertainment venues, officially recognized university-related organization properties, whether owned or leased, and real property, including parking areas, sidewalks, and common areas.

(15) A building, real property, or parking area that is or would be used for gambling or gaming of any kind whatsoever, including, but not limited to, casinos, gambling establishments, gaming clubs, bingo operations, facilities licensed by the California Horse Racing Board, or a facility wherein banked or percentage games, any form of gambling device, or lotteries, other than the California State Lottery, are or will be played.

(16) A stadium, arena, or the
 real property or parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or a collegiate or professional sporting or eSporting event.

(17) A building, real property, or parking area under the control of a public library.

(18) A building, real property, or parking area under the control of an airport or passenger vessel terminal, as those terms are defined in subdivision (a) of Section 171.5.

(19) A building, real property, or parking area under the control of an amusement park.

(20) A building, real property, or parking area under the control of a zoo or museum.

(21) A street, driveway, parking area,
 property, building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

(22) A church, synagogue, mosque, or other place of worship, including in any parking area immediately adjacent thereto, unless the operator of the place of worship clearly and conspicuously posts a sign at the entrance of the building or on the premises indicating that licenseholders are permitted to carry firearms on the property. Signs shall be of a uniform design as prescribed by the Department of Justice and shall be at least four inches by six inches in size.

(23) A financial institution or parking area under the control of a financial institution.

(24) A police, sheriff, or highway patrol station or parking area under control of a law enforcement agency.

(25) A polling place, voting center, precinct, or other area or location where votes are being cast or cast ballots are being returned or counted, or the streets or sidewalks immediately adjacent to any of these places.

(26) Any other privately owned commercial establishment that is open to the public, unless the operator of the establishment clearly and conspicuously posts a sign at the entrance of the building or on the premises indicating that licenseholders are permitted to carry firearms on the property. Signs shall be of a uniform design as prescribed by the Department of Justice and shall be at least
 four inches by six inches in size.

(27) Any other place or area prohibited by other provisions of state law.

(28) Any other place or area prohibited by federal law.

(29) Any other place or area prohibited by local law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), except under paragraph (21) or (28) of subdivision (a), a licensee may transport a firearm and ammunition within their vehicle so long as the firearm is locked in a lock box, as defined in subdivision (y) of Section 4082 of, and subdivision (b) of Section 4094 of, Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, which is a firearm safety device, as defined in Section 16540, and that is listed on the department’s Roster
 of
 Firearm Safety Devices Certified for Sale pursuant to Sections 23650 and 23655. This subdivision does not preempt local laws placing more restrictive requirements upon the storage of firearms in vehicles.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), except under paragraph (21) or (28) of subdivision (a), a licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in subdivision (a) shall be allowed to:

(1) Transport a concealed firearm or ammunition within a vehicle into or out of the parking area so long as the firearm is locked in a lock box.

(2) Store ammunition or a firearm within a locked lock box and out of plain view within the vehicle in the parking
 area. This paragraph does not preempt local laws placing more restrictive requirements upon the storage of firearms in vehicles.

(3) Transport a concealed firearm in the immediate area surrounding their vehicle within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within a locked lock box in the vehicle’s trunk or other place inside the vehicle that is out of plain view.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), a lock box is an item as defined in subdivision (y) of Section 4082 of, and subdivision (b) of Section 4094 of, Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, which is a firearm safety device, as defined in Section 16540, and that is listed on the Department’s Roster of Firearm Safety Devices Certified for Sale pursuant to
 Sections 23650 and 23655.

(e) For purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c), a lock box that was listed on the Department’s Roster of Firearm Safety Devices Certified for Sale at the time it was purchased by the licensee shall be deemed to be a compliant lock box.

(f) Except in the places specified in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a), a licensee shall not be in violation of this section while they are traveling along a public right-of-way that touches or crosses any of the premises identified in subdivision (a) if the concealed firearm is carried on their person in accordance with the provisions of this act or is being transported in a vehicle by the licensee in accordance with all other applicable provisions of law. This section does not allow a person to loiter or remain in a place
 longer than necessary to complete their travel.

(g) This section does not prohibit the carrying of a firearm where it is otherwise expressly authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 12.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26235.

(a) For purposes of implementing this chapter, the Department of Justice may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts to implement new or change existing information technology systems.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended, or changes to existing information technology systems made pursuant to this section, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19130) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 12100)
 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the Statewide Information Management Manual, and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 107.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retired Peace Officer Carrying A Concealed and Loaded Firearm [26300. - 26330.]

26300.

(a) Any peace officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2 or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired prior to January 1, 1981, is authorized to carry a concealed and loaded firearm if the agency issued the officer an identification certificate and the certificate has not been stamped as specified in Section 25470.

(b) Any peace officer employed by an agency and listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2 or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5 who retired after January 1, 1981, shall have an endorsement on the officer’s identification certificate stating that the issuing agency approves the officer’s carrying of a concealed and loaded firearm.

(c) (1) Any peace officer not listed in subdivision (a) or (b) who was authorized to, and did, carry a firearm during the course and scope of his or her appointment as a peace officer shall have an endorsement on the officer’s identification certificate stating that the issuing agency approves the officer’s carrying of a concealed and loaded firearm.

(2) This subdivision applies to a retired reserve officer if the retired reserve officer satisfies the requirements of paragraph (1), was a level I reserve officer as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6, and he or she served in the aggregate the minimum amount of time as specified by the retiree’s agency’s policy as a level I reserve officer, provided that the policy shall not set an aggregate term requirement that is less than 10 years
 or more than 20 years. Service as a reserve officer, other than a level I reserve officer prior to January 1, 1997, shall not count toward the accrual of time required by this section. A law enforcement agency shall have the discretion to revoke or deny an endorsement issued under this subdivision pursuant to Section 26305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 267, Sec. 3.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26305.

(a) No peace officer who is retired after January 1, 1989, because of a psychological disability shall be issued an endorsement to carry a concealed and loaded firearm pursuant to this article.

(b) A retired peace officer may have the privilege to carry a concealed and loaded firearm revoked or denied by violating any departmental rule, or state or federal law that, if violated by an officer on active duty, would result in that officer’s arrest, suspension, or removal from the agency.

(c) An identification certificate authorizing the officer to carry a concealed and loaded firearm or an endorsement on the certificate may be
 immediately and temporarily revoked by the issuing agency when the conduct of a retired peace officer compromises public safety.

(d) An identification certificate authorizing the officer to carry a concealed and loaded firearm or an endorsement may be permanently revoked or denied by the issuing agency only upon a showing of good cause. Good cause shall be determined at a hearing, as specified in Section 26320.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26310.

(a) Issuance of an identification certificate authorizing the officer to carry a concealed and loaded firearm or an endorsement may be denied prior to a hearing.

(b) If a hearing is not conducted prior to the denial of an endorsement, a retired peace officer, within 15 days of the denial, shall have the right to request a hearing. A retired peace officer who fails to request a hearing pursuant to this section shall forfeit the right to a hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26312.

(a) Notice of a temporary revocation shall be effective upon personal service or upon receipt of a notice that was sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the retiree’s last known place of residence.

(b) The retiree shall have 15 days to respond to the notification and request a hearing to determine if the temporary revocation should become permanent.

(c) A retired peace officer who fails to respond to the notice of hearing within the 15-day period shall forfeit the right to a hearing and the authority of the officer to carry a firearm shall be permanently revoked. The retired officer shall
 immediately return the identification certificate to the issuing agency.

(d) If a hearing is requested, good cause for permanent revocation shall be determined at a hearing, as specified in Section 26320. The hearing shall be held no later than 120 days after the request by the retired officer for a hearing is received.

(e) A retiree may waive the right to a hearing and immediately return the identification certificate to the issuing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26315.

(a) An identification certificate authorizing the officer to carry a concealed and loaded firearm or an endorsement may be permanently revoked only after a hearing, as specified in Section 26320.

(b) Any retired peace officer whose identification certificate authorizing the officer to carry a concealed and loaded firearm or an endorsement is to be revoked shall receive notice of the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be served either personally on the retiree or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested to the retiree’s last known place of residence.

(c) From the date the retiree signs for the notice or
 upon the date the notice is served personally on the retiree, the retiree shall have 15 days to respond to the notification. A retired peace officer who fails to respond to the notice of the hearing shall forfeit the right to a hearing and the authority of the officer to carry a firearm shall be permanently revoked. The retired officer shall immediately return the identification certificate to the issuing agency.

(d) If a hearing is requested, good cause for permanent revocation shall be determined at the hearing, as specified in Section 26320. The hearing shall be held no later than 120 days after the request by the retired officer for a hearing is received. 

(e) The retiree may waive the right to a hearing and immediately return the identification certificate to the issuing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26320.

(a) Any hearing conducted under this article shall be held before a three-member hearing board. One member of the board shall be selected by the agency and one member shall be selected by the retired peace officer or his or her employee organization. The third member shall be selected jointly by the agency and the retired peace officer or his or her employee organization.

(b) Any decision by the board shall be binding on the agency and the retired peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26325.

(a) A retired peace officer, when notified of the revocation of the privilege to carry a concealed and loaded firearm, after the hearing, or upon forfeiting the right to a hearing, shall immediately surrender to the issuing agency the officer’s identification certificate.

(b) The issuing agency shall reissue a new identification certificate without an endorsement.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if the peace officer retired prior to January 1, 1981, and was at the time of retirement a peace officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2 or subdivision (c) of Section 830.5, the issuing agency shall stamp on the identification
 certificate “No CCW privilege.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26330.

(a) A law enforcement agency may require a retiring or a retired peace officer seeking an endorsement on the officer’s identification certificate stating that the issuing agency approves the officer’s carrying of a concealed firearm, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 4 of Title 4, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) A law enforcement agency shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for an individual specified in subdivision (a) who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The Department of
 Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 11105.

(c) (1) The Department of Justice shall notify a law enforcement agency as to whether an individual specified in subdivision (a) is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. If the prohibition is temporary, the notice shall indicate the date that the prohibition expires. However, the notice shall not provide any other information with respect to the basis for the prohibition. The Department of Justice may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse its costs for furnishing this information.

(2) If the department is unable to ascertain the final disposition of an arrest or criminal charge, the outcome of the mental health treatment or evaluation, or the applicant’s eligibility to possess,
 receive, own, or purchase a firearm, the department shall notify the law enforcement agency.

(3) No endorsement shall be issued by any law enforcement agency unless the information described in paragraph (1) confirms the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm.

(d) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” means a police or sheriff’s department, any department or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof that employs any peace officer, as designated under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 39.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Openly Carrying an Unloaded Handgun  [26350. - 26395.]



  ARTICLE 1. Crime of Openly Carrying an Unloaded Handgun [26350. - 26350.]

26350.

(a) (1) A person is guilty of openly carrying an unloaded handgun when that person carries upon his or her person an exposed and unloaded handgun outside a vehicle while in or on any of the following:

(A) A public place or public street in an incorporated city or city and county.

(B) A public street in a prohibited area of an unincorporated area of a county or city and county.

(C) A public place in a prohibited area of a county or city and county.

(2) A person is guilty of openly
 carrying an unloaded handgun when that person carries an exposed and unloaded handgun inside or on a vehicle, whether or not on his or her person, while in or on any of the following:

(A) A public place or public street in an incorporated city or city and county.

(B) A public street in a prohibited area of an unincorporated area of a county or city and county.

(C) A public place in a prohibited area of a county or city and county.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(2) A violation of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by
 a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, if both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The handgun and unexpended ammunition capable of being discharged from that handgun are in the immediate possession of that person.

(B) The person is not in lawful possession of that handgun.

(c) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other law with a penalty greater than is set forth in this section.

(2) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of
 any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(d) Notwithstanding the fact that the term “an unloaded handgun” is used in this section, each handgun shall constitute a distinct and separate offense under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [26361. - 26392.]

26361.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by any peace officer or any honorably retired peace officer if that officer may carry a concealed firearm pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2, or a loaded firearm pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 25900) of Chapter 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26362.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by any person to the extent that person may openly carry a loaded handgun pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 26000) of Chapter 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26363.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun as merchandise by a person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing, importing, wholesaling, repairing, or dealing in firearms and who is licensed to engage in that business, or the authorized representative or authorized agent of that person, while engaged in the lawful course of the business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26364.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a duly authorized military or civil organization, or the members thereof, while parading or while rehearsing or practicing parading, when at the meeting place of the organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26365.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a member of any club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or private, while the members are using handguns upon the target ranges or incident to the use of a handgun at that target range.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26366.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a licensed hunter while engaged in hunting or while transporting that handgun when going to or returning from that hunting expedition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26366.5.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a licensed hunter while actually engaged in training a dog for the purpose of using the dog in hunting that is not prohibited by law, or while transporting the firearm while going to or returning from that training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 9.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26367.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to transportation of a handgun by a person operating a licensed common carrier, or by an authorized agent or employee thereof, when transported in conformance with applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26368.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a member of an organization chartered by the Congress of the United States or a nonprofit mutual or public benefit corporation organized and recognized as a nonprofit tax-exempt organization by the Internal Revenue Service while on official parade duty or ceremonial occasions of that organization or while rehearsing or practicing for official parade duty or ceremonial occasions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26369.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun within a gun show conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) of Chapter 3 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26370.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun within a school zone, as defined in Section 626.9, if that carrying is not prohibited by Section 626.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

26371.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun when in accordance with the provisions of Section 171b.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26372.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by any person while engaged in the act of making or attempting to make a lawful arrest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26373.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to loaning, selling, or transferring that handgun in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) of Chapter 4 of Division 6, or in accordance with any of the exemptions from Section 27545, so long as that handgun is possessed within private property and the possession and carrying is with the permission of the owner or lessee of that private property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26374.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a person engaged in firearms-related activities, while on the premises of a fixed place of business that is licensed to conduct and conducts, as a regular course of its business, activities related to the sale, making, repair, transfer, pawn, or the use of firearms, or related to firearms training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26375.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by an authorized participant in, or an authorized employee or agent of a supplier of firearms for, a motion picture, television or video production, or entertainment event, when the participant lawfully uses the handgun as part of that production or event, as part of rehearsing or practicing for participation in that production or event, or while the participant or authorized employee or agent is at that production or event, or rehearsal or practice for that production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26376.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to obtaining an identification number or mark assigned for that handgun from the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 23910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26377.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun at any established target range, whether public or private, while the person is using the handgun upon the target range.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26378.
